Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.460

Lunch period for certificated employees.

All certificated employees of school districts shall be allowed a reasonable lunch period of not less than thirty continuous minutes per day during the regular school lunch periods and during which they shall have no assigned duties: PROVIDED, That local districts may work out other arrangements with the consent of all affected parties.

[ 1995 c 335 s 702; 1991 c 116 s 15; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.275. Prior: 1965 c 18 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.275, 28.58.275.]

NOTES:

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.